Hawaii statutes.
§329D-27 Administrative rules. (a)
The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the
purposes of this chapter.

(b) No later than January 4, 2016, the
department shall adopt interim rules, which shall be exempt from chapter 91 and
chapter 201M, to effectuate the purposes of this chapter; provided that the
interim rules shall remain in effect until July 1, 2018, or until rules are
adopted pursuant to subsection (a), whichever occurs sooner.

(c) The department may amend the interim
rules, and the amendments shall be exempt from chapters 91 and 201M, to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter; provided that any amended interim
rules shall remain in effect until July 1, 2018, or until rules are adopted
pursuant to subsection (a), whichever occurs sooner. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2;
am L 2016, c 230, §20]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next